Utah statutes.
15-2-1.   Period of minority.

The period of minority extends in males and females to the age of 18 years; but all minors obtain their majority by marriage. It is further provided that courts in divorce actions may order support to age 21.



Amended by Chapter 39, 1975 General Session

